Hawaii statutes.
[§169-3] Annual report. (a) Every
private agricultural park shall file with the chairperson of the board of
agriculture an annual report as prescribed by the chairperson. A copy of the
report shall be submitted to the parties of the private agricultural park
agreement at an annual meeting or mailed to each party of the private
agricultural park agreement.

(b) The annual report shall include an
affidavit that electricity generated and distributed within the private
agricultural park was used solely for agricultural purposes within the private
agricultural park. [L 2009, c 122, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next